Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-115
Textbooks; sale; price.

The Board of Regents shall procure and have available for sale all textbooks to be used by students in the university, and shall sell them to students at a fair price, not exceeding the list price thereof.

Laws 1869, § 17, p. 177;

R.S.1913, § 7096;

C.S.1922, § 6728;

C.S.1929, § 85-114;

R.S.1943, § 85-115;

Laws 1947, c. 352, § 1, p. 1103.